North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 4. Electrical Materials, Devices, Appliances and Equipment.

§ 66-23.
Sale of electrical goods regulated.

Every person, firm or corporation before selling, offering for sale, assigning, or disposing of by gift as premiums or in any similar manner any electrical material, devices, appliances or equipment shall first determine if such electrical materials, devices, appliances and equipment comply with the provision of this Article.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 1; 1989, c. 681, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

This section does not apply to purchasers of electrical equipment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Constance K. Wilson Representative 57th District, 1998 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 57 (12/22/98).

§ 66-24.
Identification marks required.

All electrical materials, devices, appliances and equipment shall have the maker’s name, trademark, or other identification symbol placed thereon, together with such other markings giving voltage, current, wattage, or other appropriate ratings as may be necessary to determine the character of the material, device, appliance or equipment and the use for which it is intended; and it shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to remove, alter, change or deface the maker’s name, trademark or other identification symbol.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 2; 1989, c. 681, s. 1.

§ 66-25.
Acceptable listings as to safety of goods. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

All electrical materials, devices, appliances, and equipment shall be evaluated for safety and suitability for intended use. Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, this evaluation shall be conducted in accordance with nationally recognized standards and shall be conducted by a qualified testing laboratory. The Commissioner of Insurance, through the Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance, shall implement the procedures necessary to approve suitable national standards and to approve suitable qualified testing laboratories. The Commissioner may assign his authority to implement the procedures for specific materials, devices, appliances, or equipment to other agencies or bodies when they would be uniquely qualified to implement those procedures.In the event that the Commissioner determines that electrical materials, devices, appliances, or equipment in question cannot be adequately evaluated through the use of approved national standards or by approved qualified testing laboratories, the Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance shall specify any alternative evaluations which safety requires.The Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance shall keep in file, where practical, copies of all approved national standards and resumes of approved qualified testing laboratories.

Electrical devices, appliances, or equipment used by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in institutional kitchens and manufacturing equipment used by Correction Enterprises are exempt from the evaluation requirement of subsection (a) of this section.

The Department of Administration, Division of Purchase and Contract, shall not seek to enforce the provisions of subsection (a) of this section by any means, including requiring acceptance inspections or additional testing of electrical materials, devices, appliances, or equipment purchased by State departments, agencies, and institutions.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 3; 1989, c. 681, s. 1; 2013-289, s. 11; 2014-100, s. 16C.4; 2015-241, s. 16C.13A; 2017-186, s. 2(rrrr); 2017-211, s. 6(a).

§ 66-25.
Acceptable listings as to safety of goods. [Effective January 1, 2023]

All electrical materials, devices, appliances, and equipment shall be evaluated for safety and suitability for intended use. Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, this evaluation shall be conducted in accordance with nationally recognized standards and shall be conducted by a qualified testing laboratory. The Commissioner of Insurance, through the Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance, shall implement the procedures necessary to approve suitable national standards and to approve suitable qualified testing laboratories. The Commissioner may assign his authority to implement the procedures for specific materials, devices, appliances, or equipment to other agencies or bodies when they would be uniquely qualified to implement those procedures.

In the event that the Commissioner determines that electrical materials, devices, appliances, or equipment in question cannot be adequately evaluated through the use of approved national standards or by approved qualified testing laboratories, the Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance shall specify any alternative evaluations which safety requires.

The Engineering Division of the Department of Insurance shall keep in file, where practical, copies of all approved national standards and resumes of approved qualified testing laboratories.

Electrical devices, appliances, or equipment used by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in institutional kitchens and manufacturing equipment used by Correction Enterprises are exempt from the evaluation requirement of subsection (a) of this section.

The Department of Administration, Division of Purchase and Contract, shall not seek to enforce the provisions of subsection (a) of this section by any means, including requiring acceptance inspections or additional testing of electrical materials, devices, appliances, or equipment purchased by State departments, agencies, and institutions.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 3; 1989, c. 681, s. 1; 2013-289, s. 11; 2014-100, s. 16C.4; 2015-241, s. 16C.13A; 2017-186, s. 2(rrrr); 2017-211, s. 6(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 66-26.
Legal responsibility of proper installations unaffected.

This Article shall not construed to relieve from or to lessen the responsibility or liability of any party owning, operating, controlling or installing any electrical materials, devices, appliances or equipment for damages to persons or property caused by any defect therein, nor shall the electrical inspector, the Commissioner, or agents of the Commissioner be held as assuming any such liability by reason of the approval of any material, device, appliance or equipment authorized herein.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 4; 1989, c. 681, s. 1.

§ 66-27.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any of the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1933, c. 555, s. 5; 1989, c. 681, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 509; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 66-27.01.
Enforcement.

The Commissioner or his designee or the electrical inspector of any State or local governing agency may initiate any appropriate action or proceedings to prevent, restrain, or correct any violation of this Article. The Commissioner or his designee, upon showing proper credentials and in discharge of his duties pursuant to this Article may, at reasonable times and without advance notice, enter and inspect any facility within the State in which there is reasonable cause to suspect that electrical materials, devices, appliances, or equipment not in conformance with the requirements of this Article are being sold, offered for sale, assigned, or disposed of by gift, as premiums, or in any other similar manner.

History.

1989, c. 681, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27.